Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-410
Revolving machines; screens required.

A metal or other suitable screen shall be placed around each laundry extractor or other exposed high-speed revolving machinery.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 10, p. 561;

C.S.1922, § 7691;

C.S.1929, § 48-410;

R.S.1943, § 48-410.